District of Columbia statutes.
24-1202

Judiciary Square detention facility requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall construct or renovate a building within or near Judiciary Square for use as a detention facility for the District of Columbia (“District”) to house not more than 1,500 inmates. The facility shall comply with the American Correctional Association standards for correctional facilities.

(b)

The facility shall house primarily pretrial detainees, persons convicted of misdemeanors, and parole violators held pending a parole revocation hearing.

(c)

The Mayor shall issue proposed rules to classify inmates in an incoming inmate reception and diagnostic program of the facility according to rehabilitative needs, the crime committed, any drug abuse history, and appropriate housing requirements. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-117, § 3, 37 DCR 1733
1981 Ed., § 32-1702.